South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S782.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 5-1-30(A)(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) the area seeking to be incorporated has a population density of at least three hundred persons a square mile according to the latest official United States Census, except as provided in subsections (B) through (E) (F); SECTION 2.  Section 5-1-30 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (F) In determining whether the proposed incorporated municipality has the requisite population density, the Secretary of State may use any reliable and verifiable information based on the latest official United States Census that assures the closest possible conformance between the area proposed for incorporation and the data available, including: (a) full census blocks; (b) sub census blocks; (c) special census areas identified by the U.S. Census Bureau regardless of established census blocks or subblocks; or (d) reapportionment data used to determine redistricting decisions following the release of the decennial census figures. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----